Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 6 Brucellosis Control

4-6-1 — 4-6-3.
Repealed.

4-6-4.
Brucellosis test.

All cattle in the state shall be tested for brucellosis in a manner which conforms to the standards proposed and accepted by the United States livestock sanitary association and the United States department of agriculture. The director of environmental management shall establish the number of tests to be conducted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 33; P.L. 1952, ch. 2938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-6-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1.

4-6-5.
Slaughter of all reactors in state.

When the records kept by the department of environmental management indicate that eighty-five percent (85%) of the total cattle of the state, excepting steers and calves under six (6) months of age, are free from brucellosis, the state regulatory officials shall require that all brucellosis reactors be slaughtered except calfhood vaccinated animals under thirty (30) months of age.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 34; P.L. 1952, ch. 2938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-6-5

.

4-6-6.
Indemnities.

Indemnities shall be paid by the state for brucellosis reactors on the same basis and in the same manner as now provided for tuberculosis reactors.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 35; P.L. 1952, ch. 2938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-6-6

; P.L. 1970, ch. 127, § 4.

4-6-7.
Rules and regulations.

The director of environmental management, after a public hearing, may establish rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter, including health requirements for importing cattle, which have the force and effect of its provisions. A complete record of all animals coming under the chapter shall be kept. The rules and regulations entitled “Health requirements for importing cattle into Rhode Island”, a copy of which dated March 6, 1970, signed by the director of health, has been filed in the office of the secretary of state, are approved as the regulations to be effective and in force in the first instance under the provisions of this chapter and shall in all respects be deemed as effective as if adopted in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section. Those regulations shall remain in force under this chapter until and unless amended by the director in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 36; P.L. 1952, ch. 2938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-6-7

; P.L. 1970, ch. 127, § 5.

4-6-8.
Penalty for selling or transporting cattle in violation of chapter.

Any person, firm, or corporation who buys, sells and/or transports cattle in violation of this chapter, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each animal bought, sold and/or transported.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 37; P.L. 1952, ch. 2938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-6-8

.

4-6-9.
Annual appropriations — Disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 38; P.L. 1952, ch. 2938, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-6-9

.